Washington statutes.
RCW 5.44.030

Defenses available in suit on foreign judgment.

The same defense to suits on judgments rendered without such personal service may be made by the judgment debtor, which might have been set up in the original proceeding.

[Code 1881 s 740; 1877 p 150 s 745; 1869 p 171 s 682; 1866 p 88 s 2; RRS s 1256.]